South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4581.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 45 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 45-1-100.  A hotel, inn, boardinghouse, motor court, or motel where beds or lodging are for hire may not charge a transactional fee when a guest pays with cash or check. For purposes of this section, "transactional fee" means a fee that covers costs associated with maintaining the payment infrastructure and is broken down into several smaller fees, including interchange fees and assessment fees. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----